Maryland, session 2025, SB0629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–403.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, the Appellate Court of Maryland shall hold its sessions in the City of Annapolis
at the time or times it prescribes by rule.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0629*

SENATE BILL 629
(2) As designated by the Chief Judge of the Appellate Court of Maryland,
in conjunction with the deans of the University of Maryland School of Law and the
University of Baltimore School of Law, the Appellate Court of Maryland may hold sessions
at the University of Maryland, Baltimore Campus and the University of Baltimore.
(3) AS DESIGNATED BY THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE APPELLATE
COURT OF MARYLAND, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE ADMINISTRATIONS OF
SECONDARY AND POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS IN THE STATE,
THE APPELLATE COURT OF MARYLAND MAY HOLD SESSIONS AT SECONDARY AND
POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS IN THE STATE.
[(3)] (4) Its sessions shall continue not less than ten months in each year,
if the business before it so requires.
(b) A case before the Appellate Court of Maryland shall be heard by a panel of not
less than three judges. The panels shall be constituted, sit at the times, and hear the cases
as directed by the Chief Judge from time to time. A quorum of a panel consists of one less
than the number of judges designated to sit on the panel. The concurrence of a majority of
a panel is necessary for the decision of a case.
(c) A hearing or rehearing before the court in banc may be ordered in any case by
a majority of the incumbent judges of the court. Six judges of the court constitute a quorum
of the court in banc. The concurrence of a majority of the incumbent judges of the entire
court is necessary for decision of a case heard or reheard by the court in banc.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.